North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 47. State Marketing Authority.

§§ 106-528 through 106-534.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-90, s. 25(a), effective July 22, 2021.

History.

G.S. 106-528

; 1941, c. 39, s. 1; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a). G.S. 106-529; 1941, c. 39, s. 2; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a). G.S. 106-530; 1941, c. 39, s. 3; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a). G.S. 106-531; 1941, c. 39, s. 4; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a). G.S. 106-532; 1941, c. 39, s. 5; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a). G.S. 106-533; 1941, c. 39, s. 6; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a). G.S. 106-534; 1941, c. 39, s. 7; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25(a).